Wisconsin, session 2025, AB272.
do enact as follows:AB272,13Section 1. 46.286 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB272,2,2446.286 (1) (a) Functional eligibility. (intro.) A person is functionally eligible 1if the person is deaf-blind, as defined in 29 USC 1905, or if the person’s level of care 2need, as determined by the department or its designee, is either of the following:AB272,2,33